Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-411
Woodworking machinery; safety devices.

Wood planers, wood shapers, swing saws, equalizing saws, circular heading jointers, wood polishers, buzz planers, lathe bolters, and all similar machinery, shall be equipped with requisite safety appliances.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 11, p. 561;

C.S.1922, § 7692;

C.S.1929, § 48-411;

R.S.1943, § 48-411.